Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.471

Grain indemnity fund program—Proceedings against licensee.

The department may deny, suspend, or revoke the license of any grain dealer or warehouse operator who fails to timely pay assessments to the grain indemnity fund or against whom a claim has been made, approved, and paid from the grain indemnity fund. Proceedings for the denial, suspension, or revocation shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2011 c 336 s 635; 1987 c 509 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 509: See note following RCW 22.09.060.